California statutes. Civil Code
(3) Any hotel unit not otherwise specified in paragraph (1) or (2) that is located in a structure with 20 or more units or in which
20 percent or more of the accommodations were occupied as of August 5, 1987, by persons as their primary residence, if, in either circumstance, the unit was subject to rental controls on August 5, 1987, provided that any control exercised thereafter is in accordance with the system of controls in effect on August 5, 1987.

(4) Any space or dwelling unit in any mobilehome park, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Rent” means to hire real property and includes a lease or sublease.

(f) “Commercial rental control” includes any action of a public entity taken by statute, charter, ordinance, resolution, administrative regulation, or any other governmental enactment to establish, continue, implement, or enforce any control or system of controls, on the price at which, or the term for which,
commercial real property may be offered for rent, or control or system of controls which would select, mandate, dictate, or otherwise designate a specific tenant or specific person or entity with whom the owner must negotiate on the formation, extension, or renewal of a tenancy; or any other enactment which has such a purpose.

(g) “Tenant” includes a lessee, subtenant, and sublessee.

(h) “Term” means the period of time for which real property is rented or offered for rent, and includes any provision for a termination or extension of such a period or renewal thereof, except that nothing in this chapter supersedes the specific provisions of this code or of the Code of Civil Procedure which of themselves establish, prescribe, limit, or define the term for which real property may be rented.

(i) “Impasse notice” means a
written notice which states either of the following:

(1) That the owner has not received from the tenant an offer of any terms for an extension or renewal of the lease which are acceptable to the owner, or an acceptance by the tenant of any offer of terms by the owner, and that an impasse with respect to any agreement on a lease extension or renewal has been reached. 

(2) That the owner is not willing to extend or renew the lease.

(j) “Negotiation notice” means a written notice by a tenant in privity of estate, and in privity of contract with the owner, stating either of the following:

(1) That the tenant offers to extend or renew the lease on terms set forth in the notice.

(2) That the
tenant solicits an offer for the extension or renewal of the lease from the owner.

(k) “Deliver” means to deliver by personal service or by placing a copy of the notice in the mail, postage prepaid, by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the party at the address for the receipt of notices under the lease.

(l) “Developer” means any person who enters into an agreement with a redevelopment agency for the purpose of developing specific commercial real property within a redevelopment project area with the intention of acquiring ownership of that property, even if that person does not own that property when the agreement is executed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.27.

(a) No public entity shall enact any measure constituting commercial rental control, nor shall any public entity enforce any commercial rental control, whether enacted prior to or on or after January 1, 1988.

(b) However, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Relieve any party to a commercial lease or rental agreement of the duty to perform any obligation thereunder.

(2) Preclude express establishment in a commercial lease or rental agreement of the price at which real property may be offered to a subtenant or sublessee. 

(3) Impair any obligation of any contract entered into prior to January 1, 1988.

(4) Affect any provision of, or requirement for mitigation of damages under, Sections 1951 to 1952.6, inclusive.

(5) Limit any adjustment of price required or permitted by law due to constructive eviction.

(6) Enlarge or diminish in any way any power which a public entity may have with respect to regulation of rental rates or the ownership, conveyance, or use of any property specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1954.26.

(7) Relieve any party of any requirement or mandate to arbitrate, or deprive any party of any right to arbitrate or compel arbitration, which mandate or right exists pursuant to Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, titled “Arbitration,” Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1141.10) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, titled “Judicial Arbitration,” Title 1 (commencing with Section 1823) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, titled “Pilot Projects,” or any other provision of state law.

(8) Affect in any way, or preclude the inclusion of, any provision in a lease creating any lawful option, right of first refusal, or any covenant to renew or extend the lease or sell the real property or any interest therein.

(9) Relieve any person of any duty or deprive any person of any right or cause of action which may
exist pursuant to Section 51, 53, or 782.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.28.

Nothing in this chapter limits or affects public entities with respect to any of the following:

(a) The Eminent Domain Law, Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.10) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Abatement of nuisances. However, except as to conditions expressly defined as nuisances by statute, authority to abate or bring actions to abate nuisances shall not be used to circumvent the limitations of this chapter with respect to conditions not manifesting the quantum
and character of unreasonableness and injuriousness to constitute a nuisance under law.

(c) The Airport Approaches Zoning Law, Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 50485) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. 

(d) Any contract or agreement by which an owner agrees with a public entity to offer any real property for rent at a stipulated or maximum price or under a specified formula for ascertaining a stipulated or maximum price, in consideration for a direct financial contribution; any written contract between a redevelopment agency and an owner or developer of commercial real property within a redevelopment project area; or any written development agreement entered into pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 65864) of Chapter 4 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. Any contract or agreement specified in this subdivision is not
enforceable against an owner who became an owner (1) without actual knowledge of the contract or agreement, and (2) more than 30 days prior to the recording with the county recorder of a written memorandum of the contract or agreement specifically describing its terms and identifying the real property and the owner. The county recorder shall index these memorandums in the grantor-grantee index.

(e) Article 2 (commencing with Section 5020) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code, relating to historical resources.

(f) The Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(g) Any contract or agreement entered into by a public entity relating to the transfer, lease, or license of commercial real property owned or leased by that public entity, except any
requirement enacted pursuant to Section 1954.31.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.29.

Nothing in this chapter shall, with respect to a public entity:

(a) Grant, enlarge, or diminish any power (1) which it may possess under the provisions of, and for the purposes of, Division 1 (commencing with Section 65000) of Title 7 of the Government Code, (2) with respect to charter cities, planning, or zoning powers granted under Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution, or (3) any power which it may possess to mitigate the impact caused by the construction, reconstruction, demolition, or alteration of the size of any
commercial real property. However, this subdivision does not apply to any actions taken for the clear or systematic purpose of circumventing this chapter.

(b) Grant, repeal, enlarge, or diminish any authority to require a business license, whether for regulation or revenue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.30.

Nothing in this chapter grants or augments any authority of a public entity which it does not possess independent of this chapter, nor diminish any power of a public entity except as expressly provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.31.

A public entity may by enactment of a statute, charter or charter amendment, or ordinance, establish a requirement for notice relating to the termination of a lease of commercial real property due to the expiration of its term.

(a) The enactment shall contain provisions dealing with any or all of the following:

(1) The delivery of a negotiation notice by a tenant.

(2) A requirement for an owner to deliver an impasse
notice at any time after delivery of the negotiation notice, except that:

(A) The requirement shall be inapplicable unless the tenant has been required to deliver a negotiation notice not less than 270 days before the expiration of the lease, and has done so.

(B) The mandate for delivery of an impasse notice shall not occur earlier than 180 days before expiration of the lease.

(C) No impasse notice shall be required if the parties have executed a renewal or extension of the lease.

(D) Provision shall be made that the notice will include, in a form of type which will distinguish it from the body of the text of the balance of the notice, a disclosure reading, either:

(i) The giving of this
notice does not necessarily preclude further dialogue or negotiation on an extension or renewal of the lease if the parties choose to negotiate, but the delivery of this notice discharges all obligations of ____ (the owner) under provisions of ____ (the enactment) and Section 1954.31 of the Civil Code; or

(ii) By giving this notice ____ (the owner) declares that he or she does not intend to negotiate further on any extension or renewal of the lease.

(3) Establish that a bad faith failure to comply with the enactment is subject to a remedy for actual damages.

(4) Any remedy under the enactment or Section 1954.31 shall be available only by an action brought by the owner or the tenant.

(b) The enactment shall contain (or shall be deemed to contain), a
provision that:

(1) A tenant may not exercise any right pursuant to the enactment or this chapter, unless the tenant has performed the terms of the lease in such manner as would entitle the tenant to exercise any option he or she might possess under the lease.

(2) No right or cause of action accruing to a tenant pursuant to the enactment or this chapter, may be assigned other than to a person who is a lawful assignee of the lease, is in lawful possession of the premises under the lease, and is in compliance with paragraph (1).

(3) Nothing in the enactment or this chapter creates or imposes, nor shall be construed to create or impose, a duty to extend or renew, or to negotiate on an extension or renewal, of any lease; nor shall the delivery or receipt of any notice provided for by the enactment or by this chapter,
constitute a waiver of any rights to continued performance under the covenants under the lease or to actions for possession.

(4) The delivery of any notice pursuant to the enactment or this chapter shall create a rebuttable presumption affecting the burden of proof, that the notice has been properly given.

(c) No enactment shall provide, or be deemed to provide:

(1) For any extension of the term of any lease without the mutual, written consent of the owner and the tenant.

(2) For any requirement on either party to offer to extend or renew or to negotiate an extension or renewal of the lease.

(3) Bar any action brought to recover possession whether by ejectment, unlawful detainer, or other
lawful means.

(4) Any remedy under the enactment or this chapter, other than that which may be provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) The provisions of any enactment adopted pursuant to this section shall not apply to:

(1) Any lease or rental agreement which is not in writing, which constitutes a tenancy at will, which is for a term of less than one year or for an unspecified term, which is a month-to-month tenancy or a tenancy at sufferance.

(2) Any lease, the term of which expires within 270 days after the effective date of the enactment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. Residential Rent Control [1954.50. - 1954.535.]

1954.50.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Costa-Hawkins Rental Housing Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.51.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Comparable units” means rental units that have approximately the same living space, have the same number of bedrooms, are located in the same or similar neighborhoods, and feature the same, similar, or equal amenities and housing services.

(b) “Owner” includes any person, acting as principal or through an agent, having the right to offer residential real
property for rent, and includes a predecessor in interest to the owner, except that this term does not include the owner or operator of a mobilehome park, or the owner of a mobilehome or his or her agent.

(c) “Prevailing market rent” means the rental rate that would be authorized pursuant to 42 U.S.C.A. 1437 (f), as calculated by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to Part 888 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) “Public entity” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(e) “Residential real property” includes any dwelling or unit that is intended for human habitation.

(f) “Tenancy” includes the lawful occupation of property and includes a lease or
sublease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.52.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner of residential real property may establish the initial and all subsequent rental rates for a dwelling or a unit about which any of the following is true:

(1) It has a certificate of occupancy issued after February 1, 1995.

(2) It has already been exempt from the residential rent control ordinance of a public entity on or before February 1, 1995,
pursuant to a local exemption for newly constructed units.

(3) (A) It is alienable separate from the title to any other dwelling unit or is a subdivided interest in a subdivision, as specified in subdivision (b), (d), or (f) of Section 11004.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to either of the following:

(i) A dwelling or unit where the preceding tenancy has been terminated by the owner by notice pursuant to Section 1946.1 or has been terminated upon a change in the terms of the tenancy noticed pursuant to Section 827.

(ii) A condominium dwelling or unit that has not been sold separately by the subdivider to a bona fide purchaser for value. The initial rent amount of the unit for purposes of
this chapter shall be the lawful rent in effect on May 7, 2001, unless the rent amount is governed by a different provision of this chapter. However, if a condominium dwelling or unit meets the criteria of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), or if all the dwellings or units except one have been sold separately by the subdivider to bona fide purchasers for value, and the subdivider has occupied that remaining unsold condominium dwelling or unit as his or her principal residence for at least one year after the subdivision occurred, then subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) shall apply to that unsold condominium dwelling or unit.

(C) Where a dwelling or unit in which the initial or subsequent rental rates are controlled by an ordinance or charter provision in effect on January 1, 1995, the following shall apply:

(i) An owner of real property as described in this paragraph may
establish the initial and all subsequent rental rates for all existing and new tenancies in effect on or after January 1, 1999, if the tenancy in effect on or after January 1, 1999, was created between January 1, 1996, and December 31, 1998.

(ii) Commencing on January 1, 1999, an owner of real property as described in this paragraph may establish the initial and all subsequent rental rates for all new tenancies if the previous tenancy was in effect on December 31, 1995.

(iii) The initial rental rate for a dwelling or unit as described in this paragraph in which the initial rental rate is controlled by an ordinance or charter provision in effect on January 1, 1995, may not, until January 1, 1999, exceed the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1954.53. An owner of residential real property as described in this paragraph may, until January 1, 1999, establish the
initial rental rate for a dwelling or unit only where the tenant has voluntarily vacated, abandoned, or been evicted pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply where the owner has otherwise agreed by contract with a public entity in consideration for a direct financial contribution or any other forms of assistance specified in Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the authority of a public entity that may otherwise exist to regulate or monitor the basis for eviction.

(d) This section does not apply to any dwelling or unit that contains serious health, safety, fire, or building code violations, excluding those caused by disasters for which a
citation has been issued by the appropriate governmental agency and which has remained unabated for six months or longer preceding the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 568, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.53.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner of residential real property may establish the initial rental rate for a dwelling or unit, except where any of the following applies:

(1) The previous tenancy has been terminated by the owner by notice pursuant to Section 1946.1 or has been terminated upon a change in the terms of the tenancy noticed pursuant to Section 827, except a change permitted by law in the amount of rent or fees. For the purpose of this paragraph, the owner’s termination or nonrenewal of a contract or recorded agreement with a governmental agency that provides for a rent limitation to a qualified tenant, shall be
 construed as a change in the terms of the tenancy pursuant to Section 827.

(A) In a jurisdiction that controls by ordinance or charter provision the rental rate for a dwelling or unit, an owner who terminates or fails to renew a contract or recorded agreement with a governmental agency that provides for a rent limitation to a qualified tenant may not set an initial rent for three years following the date of the termination or nonrenewal of the contract or agreement. For any new tenancy established during the three-year period, the rental rate for a new tenancy established in that vacated dwelling or unit shall be at the same rate as the rent under the terminated or nonrenewed contract or recorded agreement with a governmental agency that provided for a rent limitation to a qualified tenant, plus any increases authorized after the termination
 or cancellation of the contract or recorded agreement.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply to any new tenancy of 12 months or more duration established after January 1, 2000, pursuant to the owner’s contract or recorded agreement with a governmental agency that provides for a rent limitation to a qualified tenant, unless the prior vacancy in that dwelling or unit was pursuant to a nonrenewed or canceled contract or recorded agreement with a governmental agency that provides for a rent limitation to a qualified tenant as set forth in that subparagraph.

(2) The owner has otherwise agreed by contract with a public entity in consideration for a direct financial contribution or any other forms of assistance specified in Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division
 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(3) The initial rental rate for a dwelling or unit whose initial rental rate is controlled by an ordinance or charter provision in effect on January 1, 1995, may not until January 1, 1999, exceed the amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, for a dwelling or unit subject to an ordinance or charter provision that controls the rental rate of the dwelling or unit, the jurisdiction that adopted the ordinance or charter provision may require the owner of the residential real property to permit a tenant who is not subject to eviction for nonpayment and who has a permanent physical disability as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 12926 of the Government Code and that is related to
 mobility to move to an available comparable or smaller unit located on an accessible floor of the property. An owner that is subject to a requirement established pursuant to this paragraph that is required to grant a tenant’s request for a reasonable accommodation relating to the tenant’s physical disability, after complying with any requirement to engage in an interactive process with the tenant, including Sections 12177 to 12180, inclusive, of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations, shall allow the tenant to retain their lease at the same rental rate and terms of the existing lease if all of the following apply:

(i) The move is determined to be necessary to accommodate the tenant’s physical disability related to mobility.

(ii) There is no operational elevator that serves the floor of the tenant’s current dwelling or unit. 

(iii) The new dwelling or unit is in the same building or on the same parcel with at least four other units and shares the same owner.

(iv) The new dwelling or unit does not require renovation to comply with applicable requirements of the Health and Safety Code.

(v) The applicable rent control board or authority determines that the owner will continue to receive a fair rate of return or offers an administrative procedure ensuring a fair rate of return for the new unit.

(vi) The tenant, who is not subject to eviction for nonpayment and who has a permanent physical disability as defined in
 subdivision (m) of Section 12926 of the Government Code and that is related to mobility, provides the owner a written request to move into an available comparable or smaller unit located on an accessible floor of the property prior to that unit becoming available.

(B) Any security deposit paid by the tenant in connection with their rental of the dwelling or unit being vacated shall be handled in accordance with Section 1950.5 upon the tenant’s move pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) This paragraph shall not apply unless all of the tenants on the lease agree to move to the available comparable or smaller unit located on an accessible floor of the property pursuant to the request of the tenant with the physical disability.

(D) For purposes of this paragraph, “comparable or smaller unit” means a dwelling or unit that has the same or less than the number of bedrooms and bathrooms, square footage, and parking spaces as the unit being vacated.

(E) This paragraph shall not apply if the owner, or their spouse, domestic partner, children, grandchildren, parents, or grandparents, intend to occupy the available comparable or smaller unit located on an accessible floor of the property.

(F) The requirements of this paragraph shall be in addition to those of any other fair housing law, including, but not limited to, the California Fair Employment and Housing Act (Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 12900) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51), the federal
 Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.), and any implementing regulations thereunder.

(G) This paragraph shall not be construed to prevent owners of residential real property from granting reasonable accommodations to change housing units and retain the existing lease at the same rental rate and terms in order to accommodate any disability, as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to, and includes, renewal of the initial hiring by the same tenant, lessee, authorized subtenant, or authorized sublessee for the entire period of their occupancy at the rental rate established for the initial hiring.

(c) The rental rate of a dwelling or unit whose initial rental
 rate is controlled by ordinance or charter provision in effect on January 1, 1995, shall, until January 1, 1999, be established in accordance with this subdivision. Where the previous tenant has voluntarily vacated, abandoned, or been evicted pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure, an owner of residential real property may, no more than twice, establish the initial rental rate for a dwelling or unit in an amount that is no greater than 15 percent more than the rental rate in effect for the immediately preceding tenancy or in an amount that is 70 percent of the prevailing market rent for comparable units, whichever amount is greater.

The initial rental rate established pursuant to this subdivision may not substitute for or replace increases in rental rates otherwise authorized pursuant to law.

(d) (1) Nothing in this section or any other provision of law shall be construed to preclude express establishment in a lease or rental agreement of the rental rates to be applicable in the event the rental unit subject thereto is sublet. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair the obligations of contracts entered into prior to January 1, 1996.

(2) If the original occupant or occupants who took possession of the dwelling or unit pursuant to the rental agreement with the owner no longer permanently reside there, an owner may increase the rent by any amount allowed by this section to a lawful sublessee or assignee who did not reside at the dwelling or unit prior to January 1, 1996.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to partial changes in occupancy of a dwelling or unit where one or more of the occupants of the premises, pursuant to the agreement with the owner provided for above, remains an occupant in lawful possession of the dwelling or unit, or where a lawful sublessee or assignee who resided at the dwelling or unit prior to January 1, 1996, remains in possession of the dwelling or unit. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to enlarge or diminish an owner’s right to withhold consent to a sublease or assignment.

(4) Acceptance of rent by the owner does not operate as a waiver or otherwise prevent enforcement of a covenant prohibiting sublease or assignment or as a waiver of an owner’s rights to establish the initial rental rate, unless the owner has received written notice from the tenant
 that is party to the agreement and thereafter accepted rent.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any authority of a public entity that may otherwise exist to regulate or monitor the grounds for eviction.

(f) This section does not apply to any dwelling or unit if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The dwelling or unit has been cited in an inspection report by the appropriate governmental agency as containing serious health, safety, fire, or building code violations, as defined by Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code, excluding any violation caused by a disaster.

(2) The citation was issued at least 60 days prior to the date
 of the vacancy.

(3) The cited violation had not been abated when the prior tenant vacated and had remained unabated for 60 days or for a longer period of time. However, the 60-day time period may be extended by the appropriate governmental agency that issued the citation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   (AB 1620)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.535.

Where an owner terminates or fails to renew a contract or recorded agreement with a governmental agency that provides for rent limitations to a qualified tenant, the tenant or tenants who were the beneficiaries of the contract or recorded agreement shall be given at least 90 days’ written notice of the effective date of the termination and shall not be obligated to pay more than the tenant’s portion of the rent, as calculated under the contract or recorded agreement to be terminated, for 90 days following receipt of the notice of termination of nonrenewal of
the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 590, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.8. Bed Bug Infestations [1954.600. - 1954.605.]

1954.600.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) Controlling bed bugs is uniquely challenging, as bed bug resistance to existing insecticidal control measures is significant. Cooperation among landlords, tenants, and pest control operators is required for successful control. With cooperation among landlords, tenants, and pest control operators, most bed bug infestations can be successfully controlled.

(b) Effective control is more likely to occur when landlords and tenants are informed of the best practices for bed bug control.

(c) Early detection and reporting of bed bugs is an important component required for preventing bed bug infestations. Tenants should not face retaliation for reporting a problem.

(d) Lack of cooperation by landlords and tenants can undermine pest control operator efforts to identify the presence of bed bugs and control an infestation. Depending on the treatment strategy, it is often critical that tenants cooperate with pest control operators by reducing clutter, washing clothes, or performing other activities. Likewise, inadequate or untimely response or planning by landlords may exacerbate an infestation.

(e) Pest control
 operators with knowledge and education in current best practices for bed bug management, such as those created by the National Pest Management Association (NPMA), are best equipped to help property owners and tenants eradicate bed bugs from their home. 

(f) The Structural Pest Control Board should incorporate training in bed bug management based on the National Pest Management Association (NPMA) best practices for the issuance or renewal of a Branch 2 operator, field representative, or applicator license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.601.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “pest control operator” means an individual holding a Branch 2 operator, field representative, or applicator license from the Structural Pest Control Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.602.

(a) A landlord shall not show, rent, or lease to a prospective tenant any vacant dwelling unit that the landlord knows has a current bed bug infestation.

(b) This section does not impose a duty on a landlord to inspect a dwelling unit or the common areas of the premises for bed bugs if the landlord has no notice of a suspected or actual bed bug infestation. If a bed bug infestation is evident on visual
 inspection, the landlord shall be considered to have notice pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.603.

On and after July 1, 2017, prior to creating a new tenancy for a dwelling unit, a landlord shall provide a written notice to the prospective tenant as provided in this section. This notice shall be provided to all other tenants by January 1, 2018. The notice shall be in at least 10-point type and shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) General information about bed bug identification, behavior and biology,
 the importance of cooperation for prevention and treatment, and the importance of and for prompt written reporting of suspected infestations to the landlord. The information shall be in substantially the following form:
Information about Bed Bugs

Bed bug Appearance: Bed bugs have six legs. Adult bed bugs have flat bodies about 14 of an inch in length. Their color can vary from red and brown to copper colored. Young bed bugs are very small. Their bodies are about 116 of an inch in length. They have almost no color. When a bed bug feeds, its body swells, may lengthen, and becomes bright red, sometimes making it appear to be a different insect. Bed bugs do not fly. They can either crawl
 or be carried from place to place on objects, people, or animals. Bed bugs can be hard to find and identify because they are tiny and try to stay hidden.

Life Cycle and Reproduction: An average bed bug lives for about 10 months. Female bed bugs lay one to five eggs per day. Bed bugs grow to full adulthood in about 21 days.

Bed bugs can survive for months without feeding.

Bed bug Bites: Because bed bugs usually feed at night, most people are bitten in their sleep and do not realize they were bitten. A person’s reaction to insect bites is an immune response and so varies from person to person. Sometimes the red welts caused by the bites will not be noticed until many days after a person was bitten, if at all.

Common signs and symptoms of a possible bed bug infestation:

• Small red to reddish brown
 fecal spots on mattresses, box springs, bed frames, mattresses, linens, upholstery, or walls.

• Molted bed bug skins, white, sticky eggs, or empty eggshells.

• Very heavily infested areas may have a characteristically sweet odor.

• Red, itchy bite marks, especially on the legs, arms, and other body parts exposed while sleeping. However, some people do not show bed bug lesions on their bodies even though bed bugs may have fed on them.

For more information, see the Internet Web sites of the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the National Pest Management Association.
(b) The procedure to report suspected infestations to the landlord.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.604.

Entry to inspect a tenant’s dwelling unit shall comply with Section 1954. Entry to inspect any unit selected by the pest control operator and to conduct followup inspections of surrounding units until bed bugs are eliminated is a necessary service for the purpose of Section 1954. Tenants shall cooperate with the inspection to facilitate the detection and treatment of bed bugs, including providing requested information that is necessary to facilitate the detection and treatment of bed
 bugs to the pest control operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.605.

The landlord shall notify the tenants of those units inspected by the pest control operator pursuant to Section 1954.604 of the pest control operator’s findings. The notification shall be in writing and made within two business days of receipt of the pest control operator’s findings. For confirmed infestations in common areas, all tenants shall be provided notice of the pest control operator’s findings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   (AB 551)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Hiring of Personal Property [1955. - 1959.]

1955.

Except as otherwise agreed by the lessor and the lessee in lease agreements for a term of more than 20 days, one who leases personal property must deliver it to the lessee, secure his or her quiet enjoyment thereof against all lawful claimants, put it into a condition fit for the purpose for which he or she leases it, and repair all deteriorations thereof not occasioned by the fault of the lessee and not the natural result of its use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1956.

Except as otherwise agreed by the lessor and lessee, a lessee of personal property must bear all such expenses concerning it as might naturally be foreseen to attend it during its use by him or her, and all other expenses must be borne by the lessor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 561, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1957.

If a lessor fails to fulfill his or her obligations, as prescribed by Section 1955, the lessee, after giving him or her notice to do so, if the notice can conveniently be given, may expend any reasonable amount necessary to make good the lessor’s default, and may recover such amount from him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 561, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1958.

At the expiration of the term for which personal property is leased, the lessee must return it to the lessor at the place contemplated by the parties at the time of leasing; or, if no particular place was so contemplated by them, at the place at which it was at that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 561, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1959.

The contract by which a ship is let is termed a charter party. By it the owner may either let the capacity or burden of the ship, continuing the employment of the owner’s master, crew, and equipments, or may surrender the entire ship to the charterer, who then provides them himself. The master or a part owner may be a charterer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Identification of Property Owners [1961. - 1962.7.]

1961.

This chapter shall apply to every dwelling structure containing one or more units offered to the public for rent or for lease for residential purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1962.

(a) Any owner of a dwelling structure specified in Section 1961 or a party signing a rental agreement or lease on behalf of the owner shall do all of the following:

(1) Disclose therein the name, telephone number, and usual street address at which personal service may be effected of each person who is:

(A) Authorized to manage the
premises.

(B) An owner of the premises or a person who is authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner for the purpose of service of process and for the purpose of receiving and receipting for all notices and demands.

(2) Disclose therein the name, telephone number, and address of the person or entity to whom rent payments shall be made.

(A) If rent payments may be made personally, the usual days and hours that the person will be available to receive the payments shall also be disclosed.

(B) At the owner’s option, the rental agreement or lease shall instead disclose the number of either:
